src/morphology/clitics.final.lexc
LEXICON Clitics/NG
 +Use/NG:   Clitics ;

LEXICON Clitics
 +Clit/Without:{#}la'aan{#}		FINAL ;
 +Clit/Without:{#}la'aan		Fem ;
 +Clit/na:{#}na		FINAL ;
 +Clit/se:{#}se		FINAL ;
 +Clit/ba:{#}ba		FINAL ;

 ! 39340 -> 39049
 +Clit/ee+CS:{#}{E}e   FINAL ;

 +Foc/baa:{#}	Clit_pron_aff ;
 FINAL ;

! Just the things that don't lead back to Clitics
! TODO: flag diacritic to block
LEXICON Clitics/NoFoc
 +Clit/na:{#}na		FINAL ;
 +Clit/se:{#}se		FINAL ;
 +Clit/ba:{#}ba		FINAL ;

 +Clit/ee+CS:{#}{E}e   FINAL ;

 FINAL ;
